District of Columbia statutes.
31-3514.01

Tax and related payments.

A corporation shall be subject to § 47-2608.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-245, § 15a
as added Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 5012(c), 53 DCR 6899

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-3514.02.